HW2/finnish.foma
## Author: Bin Hu
## Code adapted from the homework code skeleton
## HW2, LING 5801 23S at UMN, Instrctor: Brian Reese

### Here are regular expressions for classes of things like vowels and
### consonants to use in later expressions.

define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|I] ;
define Consonant [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z] ;

### Create an FST that contains the Finnish noun stems (see finnish_nouns.txt).
read text finnish_stems.txt
define Stem

### Create an FST that relates underlying Number and Case values to
### their surface realizations and concatenate it with the FST for the
### noun stems. Number values and +Sg, +Pl and Case values are +Nom,
### +Part. In the end you should have an FST called FinnishNouns that
### relates forms like "maa+Pl+Part" to "maaITa".

# Feature tags
define Singular "+Sg":0 ;
define Plural "+Pl" .x. I;
define Nominative "+Nom":0;
define Partitive "+Part" .x. T a;

# Lexical transducer
define Lexicon [ Stem Singular Nominative | Stem Singular Partitive | Stem Plural Partitive ] ;

# I, T realization
# The order of these rules should NOT be altered
define MonoPart [ T a -> t a || .#. Consonant* Vowel+ (I) _ ];
define BiPart [ T a -> a || Consonant+ Vowel+ Consonant* (I) _ ];
define PlBetweenVowels [ I -> j || Vowel _ Vowel ];
define DefaultPl [ I -> i ];

### Implement rules for realizing underlying forms correctly and compose them in the correct order.
# These rules should be applied AHEAD OF the I, T realization
define VowelRounding [ a -> o || \a _ I];
define VowelLowering [ i -> e || \i _ I];
define VowelDropping [ a -> 0 || Consonant+ [ o | u ] Vowel* Consonant+ _ I ];
define VowelShortening [ a a -> a , e e -> e , i i -> i , o o -> o , u u -> u ,  u o -> o , i e -> e || _ I ];

define FinishNouns Lexicon .o. VowelDropping .o. VowelRounding .o. VowelLowering .o. VowelShortening .o. MonoPart .o. BiPart .o. PlBetweenVowels .o. DefaultPl ;

### Push your final RE "FinishNouns" onto the stack, ready for use.
push FinishNouns

!lower-words
